North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 2. Nursing Home Patients’ Bill of Rights.
§ 131E-128.4.
Nursing home pharmacy reports; duties of consultant pharmacist.

The consultant pharmacist for a nursing home shall conduct a drug regimen review for actual and potential drug therapy problems in the nursing home and make remedial or preventive clinical recommendations into the medical record of every patient receiving medication. The consultant pharmacist shall conduct the review at least monthly in accordance with the nursing home’s policies and procedures.

The consultant pharmacist shall report and document any drug irregularities and clinical recommendations promptly to the attending physician or nurse-in-charge and the nursing home administrator. The reports shall include problems identified and recommendations concerning:

Drug therapy that may be affected by biological agents, laboratory tests, special dietary requirements, and foods used or administered concomitantly with other medication to the same recipient.

Monitoring for potential adverse effects.

Allergies.

Drug interactions, including interactions between prescription drugs and over-the-counter drugs, drugs and disease, and interactions between drugs and nutrients.

Contraindications and precautions.

Potential therapeutic duplication.

Overextended length of treatment of certain drugs typically prescribed for a short period of time.

Beer’s listed drugs that are potentially inappropriate for use by elderly persons.

Undertreatment or medical conditions that are suboptimally treated or not treated at all that warrant additional drug therapy to ensure quality of care.

Other identified problems and recommendations.

The consultant pharmacist shall report drug product defects and adverse drug reactions in accordance with the ASHSP-USP-FDA Drug Product Defect Reporting System and the USP Adverse Drug Reaction Reporting System. The term “ASHSP-USP-FDA” means American Society of Health System Pharmacists-United States Pharmacopoeia-Food and Drug Administration. Information released to the ASHSP-USP-FDA retains its confidentiality and is not subject to discovery or use in any civil action as provided under

G.S. 131E-128.1

.

The consultant pharmacist shall ensure that all known allergies and adverse effects are documented in plain view in the patient’s medical record, including the medication administration records, and communicated to the dispensing pharmacy. The specific medications and the type of allergy or adverse reaction shall be specified in the documentation.

The consultant pharmacist shall ensure that drugs that are not specifically limited as to duration of use or number of doses shall be controlled by automatic stop orders. The consultant pharmacist shall further ensure that the prescribing provider is notified of the automatic stop order prior to the dispensing of the last dose so that the provider may decide whether to continue to use the drug.

The consultant pharmacist shall, on a quarterly basis, submit a summary of the reports submitted under subsections (a) and (b) of this section to the medication management advisory committee established under

G.S. 131E-128.1

. The summary shall not include any information that would identify a patient, a family member, or an employee of the nursing home. The purpose of the summary shall be to facilitate the identification and analysis of weaknesses in the nursing home’s pharmaceutical care system that have an adverse impact on patient safety.

History.

2003-393, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-393, s. 3, made this section effective January 1, 2004.

§ 131E-128.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12G.2(c), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

2003-393, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 12G.2(c), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 131E-129.
Penalties; remedies.

Violation Classification and Penalties. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall impose an administrative penalty in accordance with provisions of this Article on any facility which is found to be in violation of the requirements of

G.S. 131E-117

or applicable State and federal laws and regulations. Citations for violations shall be classified and penalties assessed according to the nature of the violation as follows:

“Type A1 Violation” means a violation by a facility of the regulations and requirements set forth in

G.S. 131E-117

, or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which results in death or serious physical harm. The person making the findings shall do the following:

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type A1 Violation and the specific findings.

, c.Repealed by Session Laws 2011-249, s. 3, effective June 23, 2011.

d.

Require a written, credible allegation regarding how the facility will immediately remove the Type A1 Violation in order to protect residents from further risk or additional harm.

e.

Within 15 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

f.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on the written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance by the date specified by the Department.

The Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each Type A1 Violation. Where a facility has failed to correct a Type A1 Violation, the Department shall assess the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues beyond the date specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative. The Department or its authorized representative shall determine whether the violation has been corrected.

(1a)

“Type A2 Violation” means a violation by a facility of the regulations, standards, and requirements set forth in G.S. 131E-117 or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which results in substantial risk that death or serious physical harm will occur. The person making the findings shall do the following:

a.

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type A2 Violation and the specific findings.

b.

Require a credible allegation regarding how the facility will immediately remove the Type A2 Violation in order to protect residents from further risk or additional harm.

Within 10 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on the written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance by the date specified by the Department.

The violation or violations shall be corrected within the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative. The Department may or may not assess a penalty taking into consideration the compliance history, preventative measures, and response to previous violations by the facility. Where a facility has failed to correct a Type A2 Violation, the Department shall assess the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the deficiency continues beyond the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative. The Department or its authorized representative shall determine whether the violation has been corrected.

(1b)

“Past Corrected Type A1 or Type A2 Violation” means either (i) the violation was not previously identified by the Department or its authorized representative or (ii) the violation was discovered by the facility and was self reported, but in either case the violation has been corrected. In determining whether a penalty should be assessed under this section, the Department shall consider the following factors:

a.

Preventive systems in place prior to the violation.

b.

Whether the violation or violations were abated immediately.

c.

Whether the facility implemented corrective measures to achieve and maintain compliance.

d.

Whether the facility’s system to ensure compliance is maintained and continues to be implemented.

Whether the regulatory area remains in compliance.

“Type B Violation” means a violation by a facility’s licensee of the regulations, standards and requirements set forth in G.S. 131E-117 or applicable State or federal laws and regulations governing the licensure or certification of a facility which is detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of any resident, but which does not result in substantial risk that death or serious physical harm will occur. The person making the findings shall do the following:

Orally and immediately inform the facility of the Type B Violation and the specific findings.

Require a written plan regarding how the facility will immediately remove the Type B Violation in order to protect residents from further risk or additional harm.

Within 10 working days of the investigation, send a report of the findings to the facility.

Require a plan of correction to be submitted to the Department, based on the written report of the findings, that describes steps the facility will take to achieve and maintain compliance by the date specified by the Department.

Where a facility has failed to correct a Type B Violation within the time specified for correction by the Department or its authorized representative, the Department shall assess the facility a civil penalty in the amount of up to four hundred dollars ($400.00) for each day that the violation continues beyond the date specified for correction without just reason for such failure. The Department or its authorized representative shall ensure that the violation has been corrected.

Repeat Violations. — The Department shall impose a civil penalty which is treble the amount assessed under subsection (a) of this section when a facility under the same management or ownership has received a citation during the previous 12 months for which the appeal rights are exhausted and penalty payment is expected or has occurred, and the current violation is for the same specific provision of a statute or regulation for which it received a violation during the previous 12 months. The counting of the 12-month period shall be tolled during any time when the facility is being operated by a court-appointed temporary manager pursuant to law.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-249, s. 3, effective June 23, 2011.

Factors to be considered in determining amount of initial penalty. In determining the amount of the initial penalty to be imposed under this section, the Department shall consider the following factors:

There is substantial risk that serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation will occur.

Serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation, without substantial risk for resident death, did occur.

Serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation, with substantial risk for resident death, did occur.

A resident died.

A resident died and there is substantial risk to others for serious physical harm, abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

A resident died and there is substantial risk for further resident death.

Reasonable diligence exercised by the licensee to comply with

G.S. 131E-256

and

G.S. 131E-265

did occur.

Efforts by the licensee to correct violations.

The number and type of previous violations committed by the licensee within the past 36 months.

The number of residents put at risk by the violations.

(c1)

The facts found to support the factors in subsection (c) of this section shall be the basis in determining the amount of the penalty. The Secretary shall document the findings in written record and shall make the written record available to all affected parties including:

(1)

The penalty review committee;

(2)

The local department of social services who is responsible for oversight of the facility involved;

(3)

The licensee involved;

(4)

The residents affected; and

(5)

The family member who serves as a responsible party or those who have legal authority on behalf of the affected resident.

(c2)

Local county departments of social services and Division of Health Service Regulation personnel shall submit proposed penalty recommendations to the Department within 45 days of the citation of a violation.

The Department shall impose a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day on any facility which refuses to allow an authorized representative of the Department to inspect the premises and records of the facility.

Any facility wishing to contest a penalty shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 30 days after the Department mails a notice of penalty to a licensee. At least the following specific issues shall be addressed at the administrative hearing:

The reasonableness of the amount of any civil penalty assessed, and

The degree to which each factor has been evaluated pursuant to subsection (c) of this section to be considered in determining the amount of an initial penalty.If a civil penalty is found to be unreasonable or if the evaluation of each factor is found to be incomplete, the hearing officer may recommend that the penalty be adjusted accordingly.

(e1)

Notwithstanding the notice requirements of

G.S. 131E-24

, any penalty imposed by the Department of Health and Human Services under this section shall commence on the day the citation is imposed.

The Secretary may bring a civil action in the superior court of the county wherein the violation occurred to recover the amount of the administrative penalty whenever a facility:

Which has not requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after being notified of the penalty; or

Which has requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after receipt of a written copy of the decision as provided in

G.S. 150B-36

.

The penalty review committee established pursuant to G.S. 131D-34(h) shall review administrative penalties assessed pursuant to this section.

(g1)

In lieu of assessing all or some of the administrative penalty, the Secretary may order a facility to provide staff training if the training is:

Specific to the violation;

Approved by the Department of Health and Human Services; and

Taught by an individual approved by the Department.

The Department shall not assess an administrative penalty against a facility under this section if a civil monetary penalty has been assessed for the same violation under federal enforcement laws and regulations.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1987, c. 600, s. 2; 1989, c. 556, s. 2; 1993, c. 390, s. 2; 1995, c. 396, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 602, s. 2; 1997-431, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.122; 1998-215, s. 78(b); 2007-182, s. 1.1; 2011-249, s. 3; 2012-194, s. 29.

§ 131E-130.
First available bed priority for certain nursing home patients.

If a patient is temporarily absent, for no more than 15 days, from a nursing home to obtain medical treatment at a hospital other than a State mental hospital, the nursing home; (i) shall provide the patient with the first bed available at or after the time the nursing home receives written notification of the specific date of discharge from the hospital; and (ii) shall grant the patient priority of admission over applicants for admission to the nursing home.The duration of the temporary absence shall be calculated from the day of the patient’s admission to a hospital until the date the nursing home receives written notice of the specific date of discharge.This subsection shall not apply in instances in which the patient’s treatment can no longer be provided by the nursing home upon re-admission.

If the Department finds that a nursing home has violated the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the Department may assess a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) a day, up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), against the nursing home, for each violation.The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

The provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes that govern contested cases apply to appeals from Department action pursuant to this section.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1080, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 79.

§ 131E-131.
Rule-making authority; enforcement.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this Part.

The Department shall enforce the rules adopted by the Commission to implement this Part.

History.

1993, c. 499, s. 2.

§§ 131E-132 through 131E-134.

Reserved for future codification purposes.